apertium-glb.glb.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

  <!-- Define the alphabet below. -->
  <alphabet>aAáÁăảạÆbBcCčdDÐeEéèễệfFgGhHiIíjJkKlLmMnNoOóöớpPqQrRsSšştTŢuUúüưvVwWxXyYzZ</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <!-- Define symbol definitions within <sdef> here. -->
    <sdef n="n"               c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"              c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"           c="Verb, lexical"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"           c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"            c="Auxiliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"           c="'To be' verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"         c="'To have' verb"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"          c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"          c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"          c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="pr"              c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="vbpr"            c="Verbal Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="adv"             c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="ij"              c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="adj"             c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="prn"             c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pfx"             c="Pronoun"/>

    <sdef n="attr"            c="Attributive"/>
    <sdef n="top"             c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"             c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"             c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="org"             c="Organisation"/>
    <sdef n="al"              c="Altres / misc proper nouns"/>

    <sdef n="pers"            c="Personal pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="ref"             c="Reflexive pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="res"             c="Reciprocal pronoun"/>

    <sdef n="det"             c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="pos"             c="Possessive"/>

    <sdef n="p1"              c="1st person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"              c="2nd person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"              c="3rd person"/>

    <sdef n="nt"              c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="ut"              c="Utrum"/>
    <sdef n="GD"              c="Gender to be determined"/>
    <sdef n="f"               c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"               c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="un"              c="No gender"/>

    <sdef n="sg"              c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="du"              c="Dual"/>
    <sdef n="pl"              c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"              c="Singular / plural"/>

    <sdef n="ind"             c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def"             c="Definite"/>

    <sdef n="nom"             c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="acc"             c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"             c="Genitive"/>

    <sdef n="dem"             c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="itg"             c="Question word / interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"             c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="aff"             c="Affirmative" />
    <sdef n="neg"             c="Negative"/>
    <sdef n="emph"            c="Emphatic"/>

    <sdef n="inf"             c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="pres"            c="Present"/>
    <sdef n="imp"             c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="past"            c="Past"/>
    <sdef n="fut"             c="Future" />
    <sdef n="cni"             c="Conditional" />
    <sdef n="impf"            c="Imperfective" />
    <sdef n="perf"            c="Perfect" />
    <sdef n="pros"            c="Prospective" />
    <sdef n="pp"              c="Perfect participle"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"            c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="pasv"            c="Passive"/>
    <sdef n="actv"            c="Active voice"/>
    <sdef n="imme"            c="Immediate"/>


    <sdef n="sint"            c="Synthetic (of adjectives)"/>
    <sdef n="pst"             c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp"            c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"             c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="ord"             c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="acr"             c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="unc"             c="Uncountable"/>

    <sdef n="num"             c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="sent"            c="Sentence end"/>
    <sdef n="cm"              c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="apos"            c="Apostrophe"/>
    <sdef n="guio"            c="Dash"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"            c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"            c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"           c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"           c="Right quote"/>

    <sdef n="cmp" c="compound"/>
    <sdef n="compound-only-L" c="May only be the left-side of a compound"/>
    <sdef n="compound-R"      c="May be the right-side of a compound, or a full word"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <!-- Define paradigms within <pardef> here. -->
    <pardef n="numeral">
      <e><re>[0123456789]+</re></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="number">
      <e><par n="numeral"/><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
<!--
     <pardef n="u__vbpr">

    </pardef>

-->

    <pardef n="__vblex">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>do</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="__adj">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cor__prn">
      <e>              <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL">       <p><l>tø</l>       <r><s n="prn"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL">       <p><l>øtø</l>       <r><s n="prn"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>              <p><l>te</l>       <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>              <p><l>ete</l>      <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>              <p><l>to</l>       <r><s n="prn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>              <p><l>oto</l>      <r><s n="prn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>              <p><l>su</l>       <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
      <e>              <p><l>pul</l>      <r>pul<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>              <p><l>mo</l>       <r>mo<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>              <p><l>kwanti</l>   <r>kwanti<s n="det"/></r></p></e>
      <e>              <p><l>numer</l>   <r>numer<s n="det"/></r></p></e>      
      <e>              <p><l>loka</l>   <r>loka<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>              <p><l>watu</l>   <r>watu<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>              <p><l>seba</l>   <r>seba<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>              <p><l>maner</l>   <r>maner<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="__n">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>su</l>        <r><s n="n"/><j/>su<s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cp-R"
            c="Add hidden tag during analysis (allowing use as final compound part),
               allow generation without the tag.">
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>            <r></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l></l>            <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="cp-L"
            c="Add hidden tag for analysis as non-final compound (along with non-hidden cmp-tag),
               allow generation with non-hidden cmp-tag">
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>            <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l></l>            <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="cp-both"
            c="For analyses that can be both non-final and final">
      <e>       <p><l></l>            <r></r></p> <par n="cp-L"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>            <r></r></p> <par n="cp-R"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Example noun inflection paradigm:
    <pardef n="house__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    -->
  </pardefs>

 <e> here. -->
    <!-- Example entry:
    <e lm="house"><i>house</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
      <e lm="u">    <i>u</i><par n="u__vbpr"/></e>
      <e lm="ke">    <i>ke</i><par n="cor__prn"/></e>
      <e lm="hin">    <i>hin</i><par n="cor__prn"/></e>
      <e lm="den">    <i>den</i><par n="cor__prn"/></e>
      <e lm="ban">    <i>ban</i><par n="cor__prn"/></e>
      <e lm="moy">    <i>moy</i><par n="cor__prn"/></e>
      <e lm="nil">    <i>nil</i><par n="cor__prn"/></e>
      <e lm="alo">    <i>alo</i><par n="cor__prn"/></e>
      <e lm="sama">    <i>sama</i><par n="cor__prn"/></e>
<e lm="analisili">       <i>analisili</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="antelope">       <i>antelope</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="antelope">       <i>antelope</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="awcudunenible">       <i>awcudunenible</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ayna">       <i>ayna</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="ayna">       <i>ayna</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="baxli">       <i>baxli</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bemedisyen">       <i>bemedisyen</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="bemedisyen">       <i>bemedisyen</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bufeti">       <i>bufeti</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="bufeti">       <i>bufeti</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bumabil">       <i>bumabil</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cipenpul">       <i>cipenpul</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cudu">       <i>cudu</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="cudu">       <i>cudu</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="daybur">       <i>daybur</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="deodoran">       <i>deodoran</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="deodoran">       <i>deodoran</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deslimaple">       <i>deslimaple</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="doxolaye">       <i>doxolaye</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dwerhantatul">       <i>dwerhantatul</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="Estisa">       <i>Estisa</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="Estisa">       <i>Estisa</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fantasisim">       <i>fantasisim</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ganjoncu">       <i>ganjoncu</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="ganjoncu">       <i>ganjoncu</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hajapul">       <i>hajapul</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hotuba">       <i>hotuba</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="hotuba">       <i>hotuba</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="Jazairli ">       <i>Jazairli </i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="jipu">       <i>jipu</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="jipu">       <i>jipu</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kismetu">       <i>kismetu</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="kismetu">       <i>kismetu</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="konfortapul">       <i>konfortapul</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="layeya">       <i>layeya</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="layeya">       <i>layeya</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="Makedonili">       <i>Makedonili</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="masoyen">       <i>masoyen</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="masoyen">       <i>masoyen</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="moypul">       <i>moypul</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mwama">       <i>mwama</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="mwama">       <i>mwama</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nilpul">       <i>nilpul</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pankreas">       <i>pankreas</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="pankreas">       <i>pankreas</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="Pilipinali">       <i>Pilipinali</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="prisma">       <i>prisma</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="prisma">       <i>prisma</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sahayli">       <i>sahayli</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="seksobawlu">       <i>seksobawlu</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="seksobawlu">       <i>seksobawlu</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sonxido">       <i>sonxido</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tarhaxkun">       <i>tarhaxkun</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="tarhaxkun">       <i>tarhaxkun</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="Tuvaluli">       <i>Tuvaluli</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uranyum">       <i>uranyum</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="uranyum">       <i>uranyum</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="yakin">       <i>yakin</i><par n="__adj"/></e>
<e lm="yolyu">       <i>yolyu</i><par n="__n"/></e>
<e lm="yolyu">       <i>yolyu</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
    <e><par n="number"/></e>
